src/morphology/stems/altstem-nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_SIEMEN
!! € siemen
0   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_AJATAR
!! € ajatar
0:ar   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tare    N_BACK_SINGULARS ;
0:tar     N_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:ar      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tare N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ar      N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ar      N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ar      N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:ar      N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ar  N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:are N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ar  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ar  N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_TYTÄR
!! € tytär
0:är   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:täre    N_FRONT_SINGULARS ;
0:tär     N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:är      N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:täre N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:är      N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:är      N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:är      N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:är      N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:är  N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:äre N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:är  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:är  N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_IEN
!! € ien
0:en   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kene    N_FRONT_SINGULARS ;
0:ken     N_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0:en      N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:kene N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ken  N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:ken  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:en      N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:ken  N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:en      N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kene    N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ken  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:en  N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_PUHELIN
!! € puhelin
0:n   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:me    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:m     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:n   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:me    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:m N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:m N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:n   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:m N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:me  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:m   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_ELIN
!! € elin
0:n   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:me    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:m     N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:n   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:me    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:m N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:m N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:n   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:m N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:me  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:m   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_SUODATIN
!! € heitin
0:in   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:time    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tim     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:in   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:time    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:tim N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tim N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:in   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tim N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:in   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:time  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:in   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_HEITIN
!! € heitin
0:in   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:time    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:tim     N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:in   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:time    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:tim N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:tim N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:in   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tim N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:in   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:time  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:in   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_PUIN
!! € puin
0:in   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kime    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:kim     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:in   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:kime    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:kim N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:kim N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:in   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:kim N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:in   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kime  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:kim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:in   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_PYYHIN
!! € pyyhin
0:in   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kime    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:kim     N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:in   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:kime    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:kim N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:kim N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:in   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:kim N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:in   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kime  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:kim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:in   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_KAAVIN
!! € raavin
0:vin   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pime    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:pim     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:vin   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:pime    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:pim N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:pim N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:vin   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:pim N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:vin   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:pime  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:pim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:vin   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_SÄRVIN
!! € särvin
0:vin   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pime    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:pim     N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:vin   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:pime    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:pim N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:pim N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:vin   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:pim N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:vin   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:pime  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:pim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:vin   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_VAADIN
!! € vaadin
0:din   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:time    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tim     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:din   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:time    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:tim N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tim N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:din   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tim N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:din   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:time  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:din   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_LAIDUN
!! € vaadin
0:dun   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tume    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tum     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:dun   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:tume    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:tum N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tum N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:dun   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tum N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:dun   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:tume  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tum   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:dun   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_SÄÄDIN
!! € säädin
0:din   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:time    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:tim     N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:din   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:time    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:tim N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:tim N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:din   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tim N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:din   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:time  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:din   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;


LEXICON N_ASKELLIN
!! € askellin
0:lin   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:time    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tim     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:lin   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:time    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:tim N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tim N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:lin   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tim N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:lin   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:time  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:lin   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_SIVELLIN
!! € sivellin
0:lin   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:time    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:tim     N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:lin   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:time    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:tim N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:tim N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:lin   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tim N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:lin   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:time  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:lin   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_KÄÄNNIN
!! € käännin
0:nin   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:time    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:tim     N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:nin   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:time    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:tim N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:tim N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:nin   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tim N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:nin   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:time  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:nin   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_MUUNNIN
!! € muunnin
0:nin   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:time    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tim     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:nin   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:time    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:tim N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tim N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:nin   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tim N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:nin   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:time  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:nin   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_KIHARRIN
!! € kiharrin
0:rin   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:time    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tim     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:rin   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:time    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:tim N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tim N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:rin   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tim N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:rin   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:time  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:rin   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_KERROIN
!! € kiharrin
0:roin   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:toime    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:toim     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:roin   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:toime    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:toim N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:toim N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:roin   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tim N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:roin   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:toime  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:toim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:roin   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_KIERRIN
!! € kierrin
0:rin   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:time    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:tim     N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:rin   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:time    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:tim N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:tim N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:rin   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tim N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:rin   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:time  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:rin   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_POLJIN
!! € poljin
0:jin   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kime    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:kim     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:jin   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:kime    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:kim N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:kim N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:jin   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:kim N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:jin   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kime  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:kim   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:jin   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

!LEXICON N_HAPAN
! hapan
!0:an  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!0:pama    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!0:pam     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!0:an     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!0:pama    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
!0:pam     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!0:pam     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!0:an     N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!0:pam N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!0:an N_COMPOUND_0    ;
!0:ama N_COMPOUND_N   ;
!0:pam N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
!0:an  N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_OSATON
! viaton
0:on  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:toma    N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:tom     N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:on     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:toma    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:tom     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:tom     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:on     N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:tom N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:on N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:oma N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tom N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:on  N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_NIMETÖN
!! € työtön
0:ön  N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tömä    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:töm     N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ön     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tömä    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN ;
0:töm     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:töm     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ön     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:töm N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ön N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:öma N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:töm N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ön  N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_VANHIN
!! € sisin
0:n   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:mpa   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:mma   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:mp    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:mm    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:n   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:mpa   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:mp    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:mp    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:n   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:mpa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:mp    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:mma N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:mp  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_TEN    ;
0:mpa N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_LÄHIN
!! € sisin
0:n   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:mpä   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:mmä   N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:mp    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:mm    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:n   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:mpä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN ;
0:mp    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:mp    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:n   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:mpä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:mp    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:mmä N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:mp  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_TEN    ;
0:mpä N_COMPOUND_IN  ;
